Alaska statutes. Title 38. Public Land.
Article 7. Leasing of Mineral Land and Large-Scale Mine Legislative Approval.
A noncompetitive lease existing at October 10, 1978, shall be extended for a period of two years and so long thereafter as oil and gas is produced in paying quantities. A noncompetitive lease extended under this subsection is subject to the regulations in force at the expiration of the initial five-year term of the lease. No extension may be granted, however, unless within a period of 90 days before the expiration date an application for extension is filed by the record title holder or an assignee whose assignment has been filed for approval, or an operator whose operating agreement has been filed for approval.

No leases may be issued under this section without the inclusion of the following language “The landowners’ royalty share of the unit production allocated to each separately owned tract shall be regarded as royalty to be distributed to and among, or the proceeds of it paid to, the landowners, free and clear of all unit expense and free of any lien for it.” Leases issued in violation of this subsection shall, for all purposes, be construed as containing the language required by this subsection.

but only if the primary function of the utility with which the lessee has entered into the contract or transfer is to provide, either directly or by selling at wholesale to another utility, gas or electricity to the general public, including residential consumers, within the utilities’ service areas, and the utility with which the lessee has entered into

the contract is not an affiliated interest, as that term is defined in AS

42.05.990

, with the lessee or with a subsequent purchaser of more than 10 percent of the utility’s gas or electricity; or

the transfer is an affiliated interest, as that term is defined in AS

42.05.990

, and the transfer price between the lessee and the utility is established by an order of the Regulatory Commission of Alaska; and

unless the commissioner makes a written finding, based on clear and convincing evidence, that

the contract price or transfer price is unreasonably low;

the prospective reduction in royalty receipts would not be balanced by increased benefits to in-state gas and electric consumers;

the lessee and the utility are related in management, ownership, or other aspect and, in the case of a transfer price, that relationship is not regulated under AS 42.05; and

the contract price or transfer price is not in the best interest of the state.

“price for the gas established in the contract” includes tax reimbursement amounts, deliverability and other charges, and other forms of consideration paid by the gas or electric utility or by the manufacturer of agricultural chemicals, as appropriate, under the contract;

“state’s royalty share of gas production”

includes payments on federal leases made to the state under 30 U.S.C. 191;

does not include the state’s royalty share of gas production from land patented to the state under

P.L. 84-830, 70 Stat. 709 (Alaska Mental Health Enabling Act);

38 Stat. 1214 (Act of March 4, 1915); or

43 U.S.C. 1635 in settlement of the claims of the state under 38 Stat. 1214.

based on clear and convincing evidence,

the contract price is not unreasonably low; and

the prospective reduction in royalty receipts will be balanced by employment opportunities or other tangible benefits to the state; and

(aa)

Within 90 days after the written request of a lessee of a lease issued under this section or of a lessee of federal land from which the state is entitled under applicable federal law to receive a share of the royalty on gas production, the commissioner shall enter into an agreement with the lessee to use or accept, as the value of the state’s royalty share of gas production, the price for the gas established in the contract between the lessee and a gas or electric utility sold by the lessee under the contract or the transfer price between the lessee and a gas or electric utility for a transfer by the lessee under an order establishing the transfer price

(bb)

In (aa) and (ee) of this section,

(1)

“gas or electric utility” includes an electric cooperative organized under
AS 10.25, a municipal utility, and a gas or electric utility regulated under
AS 42.05; if the contract gas is transmitted to consumers through a pipeline and the gas utility either owns the pipeline or is related in ownership to the owner of the pipeline, then the gas utility qualifies as a “gas or electric utility” within the meaning of this paragraph only if it is bound or agrees to be bound by the covenants set out in
AS

38.35.120

or

38.35.121

, as applicable;

(2)

“manufacturer of agricultural chemicals” means a person that is a business entity primarily engaging in the manufacturing of nitrogenous and phosphatic based fertilizers, mixed fertilizers, pesticides, and similar chemicals for agricultural purposes;

(cc)

The provisions of (aa), (ee), and (jj) of this section do not prohibit the commissioner from accepting any payment on a federal lease tendered by the federal agency responsible for determination and transmittal of the payment to the state under
30 U.S.C. 191 or otherwise due the state as the state’s royalty share of gas production or the state’s royalty share of oil production irrespective of the state’s acceptance of an amount that is different than the amount due under the lease for purposes of determining royalty share on oil and gas production under that subsection.

(dd)

A lessee is eligible for the royalty in (f)(5) of this section only if production of oil or gas for sale begins from the eligible field before January 1, 2004. However, if the state or an agency of the state is a party to a suit, other than a suit brought by the lessee or agent of the lessee, and if the suit challenges (f)(5) of this section or
AS

31.05.030(i)

or an act under (f)(5) of this section or
AS

31.05.030(i)

, the January 1, 2004, deadline is extended by the number of days the state or agency of the state is a party to the suit, including any appeals.

(ee)

For a contract that is entered into on or after September 9, 2003, within 90 days after the written request of a lessee of a lease issued under this section or of a lessee of federal land from which the state is entitled under applicable federal law to receive a share of the royalty on gas production, in order to establish the value of the state’s royalty share of gas production sold by the lessee under the contract, the commissioner may enter into an agreement with the lessee to use or accept as a price for the gas an amount that is not less than the price established in the contract between the lessee and a manufacturer of agricultural chemicals, not to exceed the amount that would otherwise be due under the lease. The commissioner may enter into the agreement if it is in the best interest of the state

(1)

only if the primary function of the manufacturer is to engage in the production of a value-added product, and the manufacturer with which the lessee has entered into the contract is not affiliated with the lessee or with a subsequent purchaser of more than 10 percent of the manufacturer’s value-added product; for purposes of this paragraph, the parties to a contract or purchase are affiliated if, in the judgment of the commissioner, one of the parties to the contract or purchase exercises substantial influence over the policies and actions of the other as evidenced by relationship based on common ownership or family interest or by action taken in concert without regard to whether that influence is based upon stockholdings, stockholders, officers, or directors;

(2)

unless the commissioner makes a written finding, based on clear and convincing evidence, that

(A)

the contract price is unreasonably low; or

(B)

the prospective reduction in royalty receipts would not be balanced by employment opportunities or other tangible benefits to the state.

(ff)

The provisions of this section that authorize oil and gas leases also apply to authorize the commissioner to issue leases for the production of gas only, subject to the following:

(1)

in authorizing and managing leases under this subsection, the terms “oil and gas” or “oil or gas” as they are used in this chapter may be read and applied as appropriate as referring to gas only;

(2)

when a lease is authorized as a gas only lease, the lease does not give the lessee the right to produce oil; if a well drilling for gas under a gas only lease authorized by this subsection penetrates a formation capable of producing oil, the owner or operator

(A)

shall notify the department and the Alaska Oil and Gas Conservation Commission; and

(B)

may not conduct further operations in the drilled well until the facility complies with all applicable laws and regulations relating to oil and gas exploration and production; however, this subparagraph does not prevent the owner or operator from conducting activities that may be required by the Alaska Oil and Gas Conservation Commission to plug, plug-back, or abandon a well;

(3)

the provisions of this subsection do not apply to authorize a lease for the recovery of nonconventional gas on land that is held under an existing coal lease entered into under
AS

38.05.150

that has an active permit for exploration or mining unless the lessee under this subsection is also the lessee under
AS

38.05.150

of that land.

(gg)

For an activity or operation related to the extraction of coal bed methane,

(1)

for which the department by regulation requires submission and approval of a plan of operations before activities or operations may be undertaken, the director shall, as a condition for determining a bond requested under
AS

38.05.130

, after notice and an opportunity to be heard, review the plan of operations to determine if use of the owner’s land is reasonably necessary to extract the coal bed methane; a bond determined under
AS

38.05.130

and this paragraph may, at the discretion of the director, be imposed against a statewide bond that has been posted by the person initiating the request for determination of the bond if the statewide bond remains in effect, and an additional bond is not required;

(2)

before approving operations for the development of coal bed methane under
AS

38.05.134

,

38.05.177

, or this section, the director shall ensure that the approval is conditioned upon reasonable and appropriate

(A)

setbacks governing the placement by the operator of compressor stations; setbacks approved under this subparagraph must be determined with reference to the population density and general character of the parcels surrounding the proposed compressor station site; and

(B)

measures to mitigate the noise of compressors, engines, and other noise generating equipment operated by the operator on the lease or license; measures approved under this subparagraph must be determined with reference to the population density and general character of the parcels surrounding the proposed compressor, engine, or other noise-generating equipment.

(hh)

Notwithstanding (j) of this section, the commissioner may propose modification to a lease from which a lessee has committed gas from that lease to a North Slope natural gas project. A modification may be made under this subsection only after the commissioner makes the written determination under subsection (ii) of this section that the lease may be modified. If a modification is made, the modification shall be in effect during the initial project term that has acquired the major permits required for the work plan and budget considered by the commissioner in the written determination under subsection (ii) of this section. A modification under this subsection may

(1)

relate to switching between taking the state’s royalty gas in value and in kind to ensure that the lessee, the state, or another person shall bear proportionate costs for treatment, transportation, and liquefaction to the state’s royalty gas or gas delivered to the state under
AS

43.55.014

, and the state’s actions do not unreasonably interfere with the long-term marketing of natural gas by the lessee, the state, or another person;

(2)

provide a method for establishing a fair market value for each component of the state’s royalty gas and appropriate adjustments to reflect fair market deductions for reasonable costs for treatment, transportation, and liquefaction for the state’s royalty gas from the North Slope to the destination market; in this paragraph, “reasonable costs for treatment, transportation, and liquefaction” may not be greater than actual costs;

(3)

modify net profit shares for oil and gas and sliding scale royalty rates for gas by establishing fixed royalty rates that yield a value to the state that the commissioner determines to be not less than the value the state would have received under the terms of the lease before a modification under this subsection.

(ii)

Before making a modification to a lease under (hh) of this section, the commissioner shall make a written determination that the lease may be modified. The determination by the commissioner must be based on a clear and convincing showing by the lessee that

(1)

the modification

(A)

is in the best interests of the state; and

(B)

will materially improve the likelihood of a successful North Slope natural gas project;

(2)

a North Slope natural gas project has sufficient

(A)

financial commitment for a work plan and budget necessary to support major permits and regulatory filings required by state and federal agencies; and

(B)

commitment of gas by lessees;

(3)

the lease will produce hydrocarbons that will be transported on a North Slope natural gas project during the initial project term; and

(4)

the lessee or an affiliate of the lessee has offered to purchase, dispose of, or market the state’s royalty gas taken in kind and gas delivered to the state under
AS

43.55.014

on the same or substantially similar terms as the lessee or an affiliate of the lessee sells, disposes of, or markets the lessee’s gas.

(jj)

Upon written request of a lessee of a lease issued under this section or of a lessee of federal land from which the state is entitled to receive a share of the royalty on oil production, the commissioner may enter into an agreement with the lessee to accept, as a value for the state’s royalty share of oil production sold to an in-state refiner, an amount that is not less than the price established in a contract between the lessee and the in-state refiner but not exceeding the amount that would otherwise be due under the lease. This subsection applies to a contract entered into after December 31, 2014. The commissioner shall respond to a request received under this subsection within 90 days after the receipt of the request by the department. The commissioner may enter into an agreement under this subsection if

(1)

the commissioner issues a written finding that

(A)

the agreement is in the best interest of the state;

(B)

the parties to the contract between the lessee and the in-state refiner are not affiliated under (2) of this subsection; and

(2)

the primary function of the in-state refiner’s contracting with the lessee is to engage in the manufacture of refined petroleum products in the state, and the in-state refiner is not affiliated with the lessee or with a subsequent purchaser of more than 10 percent of the in-state refiner’s product; the parties to a contract or purchase are affiliated if, in the judgment of the commissioner, one of the parties to the contract or purchase exercises substantial influence over the policies and actions of the other as evidenced by a relationship based on common ownership or family interest or by action taken in concert whether or not that influence is based on stockholdings, stockholders, officers, or directors.

(kk)

In (cc) and (jj) of this section,

(1)

“in-state refiner” means a person engaged in the manufacture of refined petroleum products in the state;

(2)

“price established in a contract between the lessee and the in-state refiner” includes tax reimbursement amounts, deliverability and other charges, and other forms of consideration paid by the in-state refiner, as appropriate, under the contract;

(3)

“state’s royalty share of oil production” includes payments on federal leases made to the state under
30 U.S.C. 191.

(

ll

)

For a contract that is entered into on or after July 1, 2017, within 90 days after the written request of a lessee of a lease issued under this section, in order to establish the value of the state’s royalty share of gas production sold by the lessee under the contract, the commissioner may enter into an agreement with the lessee to use or accept as a price for the gas an amount that is not less than the price established in the contract between the lessee and an in-state processing facility whose primary function is the manufacturing and sale of urea, ammonia, or gas-to- liquid products to third parties in arm’s length transactions, not to exceed the amount that would otherwise be due under the lease. The commissioner may enter into an agreement under this subsection if

(1)

the commissioner makes a written finding that

(A)

it is in the best interest of the state; and

(B)

based on clear and convincing evidence, the contract price is not unreasonably low;

(2)

the primary function of the in-state processing facility is to engage in the production of urea, ammonia, or gas-to-liquid products, and the lessee is not affiliated either with an owner of the in-state processing facility or with a subsequent purchaser of more than 10 percent of the urea, ammonia, or gas-to-liquid products produced by the processing facility; for purposes of this paragraph, the parties are affiliated if, in the judgment of the commissioner, one of the parties exercises substantial influence over the policies and actions of the other as evidenced by a relationship based on common ownership or family interest or by action taken in concert without regard to whether that influence is based on stockholdings, stockholders, officers, or directors; in this paragraph, “gas-to-liquid product” means a liquid produced by a processing facility that combines, breaks up, or rearranges atoms present in natural gas, but does not include liquefied natural gas; and

(3)

the agreement requires, to the maximum extent permitted by law, the lessee to

(A)

hire qualified residents from throughout the state for management, engineering, construction, operation, maintenance, and other positions;

(B)

establish hiring facilities in the state or use existing hiring facilities in the state; and

(C)

use, as far as practicable, the job centers and associated services operated by the Department of Labor and Workforce Development and an Internet-based labor exchange system operated by the state.

History.

(§ 3(7) art VIII ch 169 SLA 1959; am § 18 ch 61 SLA 1960; am § 1 ch 124 SLA 1962; am §§ 4 — 7 ch 30 SLA 1964; am § 20 ch 70 SLA 1964; am § 2 ch 91 SLA 1967; am § 1 ch 65 SLA 1969; am § 1 ch 86 SLA 1970; am § 1 ch 155 SLA 1978; am § 16 ch 160 SLA 1978; am §§ 3, 4 ch 65 SLA 1979; am § 6 ch 18 SLA 1980; am § 36 ch 94 SLA 1980; am §§ 1 — 5 ch 111 SLA 1980; am §§ 11, 12 ch 161 SLA 1984; am § 1 ch 89 SLA 1985; am § 2 ch 55 SLA 1986; am §§ 3, 4 ch 124 SLA 1990; am § 5 ch 134 SLA 1990; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 53 SLA 1993; am §§ 5, 6 ch 35 SLA 1994; am § 1 ch 36 SLA 1994; am §§ 67, 68 ch 21 SLA 1995; am §§ 2 — 5 ch 85 SLA 1995; am § 42 ch 30 SLA 1996; am § 2 ch 53 SLA 1996; am §§ 2 — 4 ch 138 SLA 1996; am § 6 ch 140 SLA 1996; am § 10 ch 56 SLA 1997; am §§ 2, 3 ch 29 SLA 1998; am § 85 ch 21 SLA 2000; am §§ 1 — 4 ch 58 SLA 2003; am § 2 ch 59 SLA 2003; am §§ 1 — 4 ch 72 SLA 2003; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 8 SLA 2004; am §§ 29 — 41 ch 49 SLA 2004; am § 1 ch 81 SLA 2005; am § 8 ch 1 SSSLA 2007; am § 5 ch 16 SLA 2010; am § 6 ch 11 SLA 2013; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 20 SLA 2013; am §§ 27, 28 ch 14 SLA 2014; am §§ 1, 2 ch 108 SLA 2014; am § 1 ch 58 SLA 2016; am § 33 ch 4 4SSLA 2016)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1990, a reference to (m) of this section was deleted from the last sentence of (w) of this section to correct a manifest error in § 4, ch. 124, SLA 1990.

In 1995, in subsection (s), “communitization” was substituted for “communization” to correct a manifest error in § 4, ch. 85, SLA 1995.

In 1996, in the first sentence of subsection (s), “communitization” was substituted for “communication” to correct a printing error.

In 1996, in subsection (w), “state of rental” was substituted for “state or rental” to correct an error that occurred in printing ch. 155, SLA 1978.

Paragraph (bb)(2) was enacted as (bb)(4).
Renumbered in 2003, at which time paragraphs (bb)(2) and (3) were renumbered as (bb)(3) and (4).

In 2004, in subsection (b), “and proposed gas only lease sales” was added in order to reconcile § 1, ch. 8, SLA 2004 and § 30, ch. 49, SLA 2004

In 2014, two references to “(ii) of this section” in subsection (hh) were replaced with references to “subsection (ii)”.

Subsections (jj) and (kk) were enacted as (hh) and (ii); relettered in 2014.

Cross references. —

For establishment of drilling units for pools, see AS

31.05.100

; for required legislative approval of dispositions of oil or gas, see AS

38.06.055

; for development of stranded gas, see AS 43.82.

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 14, SLA 2014, which amended (i) of this section and added subsections (hh) and (ii), see 2014 Senate Journal 1423 — 1426.

Administrative Code. —

For disposition of royalty oil, gas, or gas liquids, see 11 AAC 3.

For payment of oil and gas royalties, rents, and bonuses, see 11 AAC 4.

For fees for department services, see 11 AAC 5.

For availability of land, see 11 AAC 82, art. 1.

For qualifications, see 11 AAC 82, art. 2.

For competitive bidding, see 11 AAC 82, art. 4.

For noncompetitive procedures, see 11 AAC 82, art. 5.

For royalty products, see 11 AAC 82, art. 7.

For net profit share leasing, see 11 AAC 83, art. 2.

For unitization, see 11 AAC 83, art. 3.

For communitization and drilling and development contracts, see 11 AAC 83, art. 4.

For underground storage, see 11 AAC 83, art. 5.

For federal leases and preference rights on Alaska lands, see 11 AAC 83, art. 6.

For work commitment, see 11 AAC 83, art. 7.

For exploration incentive credit, see 11 AAC 83, art. 8.

For exempt lease sales, see 11 AAC 83, art. 9.

For Cook Inlet discovery royalty, see 11 AAC 83, art. 10.

For geothermal unitization, see 11 AAC 84, art. 8.

For noncompetitive leasing, see 11 AAC 85, art. 2.

For additional provisions for seismic exploration and stratigraphic tests, see 11 AAC 96, art. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The first 2014 amendment, effective May 9, 2014, in (i), in the fifth sentence, substituted “AS

43.55.011

” for “AS 43.55”, and made a stylistic change; and effective January 1, 2015, added (hh) and (ii).

The second 2014 amendment, effective January 1, 2015, in (cc), substituted ‘‘(aa), (ee), and (jj)’’ for ‘‘(aa) and (ee)’’ near the beginning, inserted ‘‘or the state’s royalty share of oil production’’ following ‘‘royalty share of gas production’’, and inserted ‘‘oil and’’ following ‘‘determining royalty share on’’ near the end; added (hh) [now (jj)] and (ii) [now (kk)].

The first 2016 amendment, effective July 1, 2017, added (

ll

).

The second 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, repealed (i).

Opinions of attorney general. —

Former AS 38.05.305(a) did not apply to actions approving unit agreements in which one automatic consequence of unitization would be extension of the lease terms where the leases were issued prior to September 22, 1977, since extension of a lease term upon unitization did not constitute ‘‘renewal’’ within the meaning of former AS 38.05.305(a); moreover, there was good reason to believe that former AS 38.05.305(a) would also be inapplicable in the case of a unit involving state leases issued after September 22, 1977. November 25, 1977, Op. Att’y Gen.

The public notice requirement of AS

38.05.945

probably does not apply to the automatic lease term extension that occurs as a consequence of unitization since such extension is a measure to enhance the feasibility of unitized operation, not a disposal action.
November 25, 1977, Op. Att’y Gen.